Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-1115
Investigations; subpoena; director; powers.

(1) The director in his or her discretion (a) may make such public or private investigations within or without this state as he or she deems necessary to determine whether any registration should be granted, denied, or revoked or whether any person has violated or is about to violate the Securities Act of Nebraska or any rule and regulation or order under the act or to aid in the enforcement of the act or in the adopting and promulgating of rules and regulations and the prescribing of forms under the act, (b) may require or permit any person to file a statement in writing, under oath or otherwise as the director may determine, as to all the facts and circumstances concerning the matter to be investigated, and (c) may publish information concerning any violation of the act or any rule and regulation or order under the act. In the discretion of the director, the actual expense of any such investigation may be charged to the applicant or person who is the subject of the investigation.

(2) For the purpose of any investigation or proceeding under the act, the director or any person designated by him or her may administer oaths and affirmations, subpoena witnesses, compel their attendance, take evidence, and require the production of any books, papers, correspondence, memoranda, agreements, or other documents or records which the director deems relevant or material to the inquiry.

(3) At the request of an administrator responsible for enforcement of the securities laws of another state, the director may issue subpoenas to compel the attendance of any person or require the production of records in this state if the alleged violation being investigated would be a violation of the Securities Act of Nebraska if the activities had occurred in this state.

(4) In case of contumacy by or refusal to obey a subpoena issued to any person, any court of competent jurisdiction, upon application by the director, may issue to such person an order requiring him or her to appear before the director, or the officer designated by the director, there to produce documentary evidence if so ordered or to give evidence touching the matter under investigation or in question. Any failure to obey the order of the court may be punished by the court as a contempt of court.

Laws 1965, c. 549, § 15, p. 1791;

Laws 1987, LB 497, § 1;

Laws 2017, LB148, § 14.